Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-668.01
Unemployment compensation; services performed in another state; arrangements with other states; alter.

If after entering into an arrangement provided by sections 48-668 to 48-668.03 the commissioner finds that the employment security law of any state or of the federal government participating in such arrangement has been changed in a material respect, the commissioner shall make a new finding as to whether such arrangement shall be continued with such state or with the federal government.

Laws 1949, c. 163, § 17(2), p. 434.